Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-719
Political party conventions; individual
vote; unit voting prohibited.

At all political
party conventions held under sections
32-707 and 32-710, each delegate shall be entitled to register
his or her individual vote, and it shall be unlawful to attempt to bind any
delegate by any political party or convention rules requiring the delegates
from any political subdivision to such convention to vote as one unit.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 219;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 10.